Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.720

Consolidated mail service—Review needs of state agencies.

The department, in cooperation with the office of financial management, shall review current and prospective needs of state agencies for any equipment to process mail throughout state government. If after such consultation, the department should find that the economy, efficiency, or effectiveness of state government would be improved by such a transfer or other disposition, then the property shall be transferred or otherwise disposed.

After making such finding, the department shall direct the transfer of existing state property, facilities, and equipment pertaining to the consolidated mail service or United States postal service. Any dispute concerning the benefits in state governmental economy, efficiency, and effectiveness shall be resolved by the office of financial management.

[ 1993 c 219 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1993 c 219: See notes following RCW 43.19.710.